Utah statutes.
17-27a-505.5.   Limit on single family designation.

(1)  As used in this section, "single-family limit" means the number of unrelated individuals allowed to occupy each residential unit that is recognized by a land use authority in a zone permitting occupancy by a single family.

(2)  A county may not adopt a single-family limit that is less than:

(a)  three, if the county has within its unincorporated area:

(i)  a state university; or

(ii)  a private university with a student population of at least 20,000; or

(b)  four, for each other county.



Amended by Chapter 172, 2012 General Session

